West Virginia, session 2026, HB4224.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5B. Authorization for OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 5B - 1. Office of Inspector General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16B-4-5 of this code, modified by the Office of Inspector General to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 23, 2025, relating to the Office of Inspector General (nursing home licensure, 71 CSR 15), is authorized.